Hawaii statutes.
[§806D-6] Issuance of criminal process.
A judge of the district or circuit court may issue any criminal process to any
recipient at any address within or out of the State, for any matter over which
the court has criminal jurisdiction pursuant to section 701-106. This section
does not limit a court's authority to issue warrants or legal process under other
state law. [L 2012, c 325, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next